Utah statutes.
54-7-2.   Process -- Service -- Fees.
The process issued by the commission or any commissioner shall extend to all
parts of the state, and may be served by any person authorized to serve
process of courts of record, or by any person designated for that purpose by
the commission or a commissioner. The person executing any such process shall
receive such compensation as may be allowed by the commission, not to exceed
the fees prescribed by law for similar services in civil actions, and such
fees shall be paid in the same manner as provided herein for payment of the
fees of witnesses.
